Utah statutes.
17B-2a-803.   Provisions applicable to public transit districts.

(1) (a)  Each public transit district is governed by and has the powers stated in:

(i)  this part; and

(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts.

(b) (i)  Except for Sections 17B-1-301, 17B-1-311, and 17B-1-313, the following provisions do not apply to public transit districts:

(A)  Chapter 1, Part 3, Board of Trustees; and

(B)  Section 17B-2a-905.

(ii)  A public transit district is not subject to Chapter 1, Part 6, Fiscal Procedures for Local Districts.

(2)  This part applies only to public transit districts.

(3)  A public transit district is not subject to the provisions of any other part of this chapter.

(4)  If there is a conflict between a provision in Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts, and a provision in this part, the provision in this part governs.



Amended by Chapter 364, 2009 General Session

